csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_n.yaml
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: gimiinigosiinaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: gimiinigosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: gimiinigoosiiminaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Incl: gimiinigominaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Incl: gimiinigominaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: gimiinigonaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: gimiinigonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: gimiinigoominaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Incl: gimiinigosiimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Incl: gimiinigosiimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: gimiinigosiinaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: gimiinigosiinaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: gimiinigoosiimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Incl: gimiinigomin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Incl: gimiinigomin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: gimiinigonaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: gimiinigonaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: gimiinigoomin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Incl: gimiinigosiiminaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Incl: gimiinigosiiminaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: gimiinigosiinaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: gimiinigosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: gimiinigoosiiminaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Incl: gimiinigominaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Incl: gimiinigominaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: gimiinigonaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: gimiinigonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: gimiinigoominaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: miinigosiiwaanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: miinigosiiwegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: miinigosiiwanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: miinigosiiwaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinigosiinigwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: miinigosiigwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: miinigosiiwaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: miinigosiiwangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: miinisinowagoogwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: miinisiinowaanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: miinaasiwaawagwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwaawagen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: miinaasiwaawagen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: miizhisiiwegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: miinaasiwaawegwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwaawegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: miinaasiwaawegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: miizhisiiwaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: miizhisiiwanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: miinaasiwaawadwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwaawaden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: miinaasiwaawaden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: miizhisiiwaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: miizhisiiwaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: miinigoosiiwegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: miinisiinowegwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaasiwaawaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: miizhisiiwangidwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: miinisiinowangwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: miinigosiiwaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: miinigosiigwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: miizhisiigwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: miinigoosiiwanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: miinisiinowegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaasiigwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: miizhisiiwangiden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: miinisiinowangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: miinisiinogwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: miinisiinogwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: miinaasiwaawangidwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwaawangiden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: miinaasiwaawangiden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: miinaasiwaawangwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwaawangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: miinaasiwaawangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: miinigoosiiwaanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: miinigoosiiwegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: miinigoosiiwanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: miinaasiwaawindwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwaawinden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: miinaasiwaawinden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: miinigoosiiwaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: miinigoosiiwangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: miinigowaanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: miinigowegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: miinigowanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: miinigowaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinigonigwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: miinigogwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: miinigowaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: miinigowangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: miininagoogwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: miininowaanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: miinaawagwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaawagen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: miinaawagen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: miizhiwegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: miinaawegwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaawegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: miinaawegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: miizhiwaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: miizhiwanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: miinaawadwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaawaden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: miinaawaden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: miizhiwaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: miizhiwaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: miinigoowegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: miininowegwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaawaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: miizhiwangidwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: miininowangwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: miinigowaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: miinigogwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: miizhigwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: miinigoowanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: miininowegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: miizhiwangiden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: miininowangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: miininogwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: miininogwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: miinaawangidwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaawangiden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: miinaawangiden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: miinaawangwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaawangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: miinaawangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: miinigoowaanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: miinigoowegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: miinigoowanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: miinaawindwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaawinden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: miinaawinden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: miinigoowaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: miinigoowangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: miinigosiwaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: miinigosiweg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: miinigosiwan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: miinigosigwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinigosinig
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: miinigosig
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: miinigosiwaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: miinigosiwang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: miinisinowagog
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: miinisinowaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: miinaasiwagwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwag
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: miinaasiwag
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: miizhisiweg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: miinaasiwegwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiweg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: miinaasiweg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: miizhisiwaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: miizhisiwan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: miinaasiwadwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: miinaasiwad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: miizhisiwaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: miizhisigwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: miinisinowegwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: miinisinokwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaasigwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: miizhisiwangidwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: miinisinowangwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: miinigosigwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: miinigosig
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: miizhisig
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: miinisinoweg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: miinisinok
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaasig
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: miizhisiwangid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: miinisinowang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: miinigosiweg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: miinigoosiwan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: miinaasiwangidwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwangid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: miinaasiwangid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: miinaasiwangwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: miinaasiwang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: miinigoosiwaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: miinigoosiweg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: miinigoosiwan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: miinaasiwindwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwind
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: miinaasiwind
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: miinigoosiwaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: miinigoosiwang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: miinigoyaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: miinigoyeg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: miinigoyan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: miinigowaad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinigonid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: miinigod
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: miinigoyaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: miinigoyang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: miininagog
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: miininaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: miinagwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimag
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: miinag
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: miizhiyeg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: miinegwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimeg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: miineg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: miizhiyaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: miizhiyan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: miinadwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: miinad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: miizhiyaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: miizhiwaad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: miininegwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: miinikwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaawaad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: miizhiyangidwaa
